test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-katuuks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - katūks: # Noun 205 'eng /est katus/fin' - full paradigm
     katūks+N+Sg+Nom: katūks
     katūks+N+Sg+Gen: katūks
     katūks+N+Sg+Par: katūkst
     katūks+N+Sg+Dat: katūksõn
     katūks+N+Sg+Ins: katūksõks
     katūks+N+Sg+Ill: katūksõ
     katūks+N+Sg+Ela: katūksõst
     katūks+N+Pl+Nom: katūkst
     katūks+N+Pl+Gen: katūkst
     katūks+N+Pl+Par: katūkši
     katūks+N+Pl+Dat: katūkstõn
     katūks+N+Pl+Ins: katūkstõks
     katūks+N+Pl+Ill: katūkšiz
     katūks+N+Pl+Ela: katūkšist
